Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 13

Districts by Mutual Consent

69-5-1301. Mutual agreements authorized.

The owners of land that requires combined drainage may provide for the establishment of a drainage district, or location and construction of drains, ditches, and watercourses upon their own lands by mutual agreement in writing duly signed, acknowledged, and filed with the county clerk.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 38; Shan., § 3871a146; Code 1932, § 4381; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1701; T.C.A. §69-6-1301.

Cross-References. Circuit court defined, §69-5-102.

69-5-1302. Contents of agreement — Validity.

A mutual agreement may include the location, the character of work to be done, the adjustment of the damages, the classification of the lands to be benefited by the agreement, the amount of special assessments to be levied, when the special assessments shall be levied, or so many of these or other provisions as may be agreed upon, and to such extent shall be as valid and binding as though performed in the mode and manner provided for in parts 1-12 of this chapter.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 38; Shan., § 3871a147; Code 1932, § 4382; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1702; T.C.A. §69-6-1302.

69-5-1303. Jurisdiction over mutual agreement districts.

Upon the filing of the agreement with the county clerk, the county court shall establish such drainage district and locate the ditch, drain, or watercourse provided for in the mutual agreement according to the terms of the agreement, and shall have full and complete jurisdiction of the parties and subject matter, and order such procedure under this chapter as may be required to carry out the object and intent of such agreement, and to complete and construct the desired improvement, and shall retain jurisdiction of the parties and subject matter as fully as in other cases provided for in this chapter.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 38; Shan., § 3871a148; mod. Code 1932, § 4383; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1703; T.C.A. §69-6-1303.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.